Tennessee, session 114, HB2531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-154, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Firefighting equipment":
(A) Means the equipment used by a firefighter to contain or
extinguish fires and to protect the life of the firefighter; and
(B) Does not include fire trucks or vehicles;
(2) "Rescue equipment":
(A) Means equipment used by a rescue squad for the purposes of
performing rescue services or other emergency response; and
(B) Does not include vehicles;
(3) "Rescue squad" means a department of a municipality, county, or
political subdivision, or a nonprofit organization that offers its services, for or
without pay, for the purposes of performing rescue services or other emergency
response; and
(4) "Volunteer fire department" means a fire department recognized by
the state fire marshal's office, pursuant to § 68-102-304, as a volunteer fire
department.
(b) The following grant programs are established:
HB2531
011263
- 1 -

(1) The volunteer firefighter equipment and training grant program, to
annually provide grants to select volunteer fire departments to be used for the
purchase of firefighting equipment or to meet local match requirements of federal
grants for the purchase of firefighting equipment and training; and
(2) The rescue squad grant program, to annually provide grants to select
rescue squads to be used for the purchase of firefighting equipment and rescue
equipment.
(c) The total amount of grants awarded each year under the program
established by subdivision (b)(1) must be equally divided among the three (3) grand
divisions of this state.
(d) It is the legislative intent to fund the grant programs created by subsection (b)
by providing a sum-sufficient appropriation in each fiscal year's annual appropriation bill.
(e) The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall promulgate rules in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter
5, to establish guidelines for evaluating grant requests and determining which volunteer
fire departments or rescue squads will receive grants pursuant to this section.
(f) The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall decide which grants to
award and shall disburse the grants to the selected volunteer fire departments and
rescue squads. The commissioner shall endeavor to expend all funds appropriated to
the grant programs each year, and any funds remaining must not revert to the general
fund but remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011263